Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.250

Advanced registered nurse practitioner—Activities allowed. (Effective until June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

An advanced registered nurse practitioner under his or her license may perform for compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the ill, injured, or infirm, and in the course thereof, she or he may do the following things that shall not be done by a person not so licensed, except as provided in RCW 18.79.260 and 18.79.270:

(1) Perform specialized and advanced levels of nursing as recognized jointly by the medical and nursing professions, as defined by the *commission;

(2) Prescribe legend drugs and Schedule V controlled substances, as defined in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, and Schedules II through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s) within the scope of practice defined by the *commission;

(3) Perform all acts provided in RCW 18.79.260;

(4) Hold herself or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as an advanced registered nurse practitioner or as a nurse practitioner.

[2000 c 64 s 4; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 425.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Severability—2000 c 64: See note following RCW 18.79.050.

PDFRCW 18.79.250

Advanced practice registered nurse—Activities allowed. (Effective June 30, 2027.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

An advanced practice registered nurse under his or her license may perform for compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, of the ill, injured, or infirm, and in the course thereof, she or he may do the following things that shall not be done by a person not so licensed, except as provided in RCW 18.79.260 and 18.79.270:

(1) Perform specialized and advanced levels of nursing as recognized jointly by the medical and nursing professions, as defined by the board;

(2) Prescribe legend drugs and Schedule V controlled substances, as defined in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act, chapter 69.50 RCW, and Schedules II through IV subject to RCW 18.79.240(1) (r) or (s) within the scope of practice defined by the board;

(3) Perform all acts provided in RCW 18.79.260;

(4) Hold herself or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as an advanced practice registered nurse or as a nurse practitioner.

[2024 c 239 s 13; 2000 c 64 s 4; 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 425.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 239: See note following RCW 18.79.030.

Severability—2000 c 64: See note following RCW 18.79.050.